Hawaii statutes.
§328-96 Hawaii list of equivalent generic
drug products and interchangeable biological products. (a) The director
may adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 91, to effectuate the purpose of this
part. Without regard to chapter 91, the director may adopt as rules, and amend
as necessary, the Hawaii list of equivalent generic drug products and
interchangeable biological products, which shall serve as the state list of
substitutable equivalent generic drug products and interchangeable biological
products. The director's approval of the substitutability of equivalent
generic drug products and interchangeable biological products shall be informed
by the findings of the United States Food and Drug Administration, which are
documented and periodically updated through the following:

(1) For a generic drug product: the Orange Book and any United
States Food and Drug Administration documentation of any United States Food and
Drug Administration-approved generic drug product with therapeutic equivalency,
including:

(A) Letters of approval of Abbreviated New
Drug Applications with therapeutic equivalency evaluations;

(B) Published listings of approved New Drug
Applications or approved Abbreviated New Drug Applications with therapeutic
equivalency evaluations; and

(C) Listing of first time generics with
therapeutic equivalency evaluations;

(2) For a biological product: approval under the Public Health
Service Act, the Purple Book, and any United States Food and Drug
Administration documentation of any United States Food and Drug
Administration-approved interchangeability determination, including:

(A) Letters of approval of Biologic Licensing
Applications with a determination that the biological product meets the
criteria for interchangeability as set forth in title 42 United States Code
section 262(k)(4); and

(B) Published listings of approved Biologic
Licensing Applications with a determination that the biological product meets
the criteria for interchangeability as set forth in title 42 United States Code
section 262(k)(4); and

(3) For a biological product approved under the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act: the Orange Book and any United States
Food and Drug Administration documentation of any United States Food and Drug
Administration-approved interchangeability determination, including:

(A) Letters of approval of approved New Drug
Applications or approved Abbreviated New Drug Applications with therapeutic
equivalency evaluations; and

(B) Published listings of approved New Drug
Applications or approved Abbreviated New Drug Applications with therapeutic
equivalency evaluations.

(b) The director shall maintain an official
record of, and update as necessary, the Hawaii list of equivalent generic drugs
and interchangeable biological products electronically on the department's
website, which shall be accessible to pharmacists and other interested persons.

(c) The Hawaii list of equivalent generic drug
products and interchangeable biological products shall only include
substitutable generic drug products and interchangeable biological products
that are determined by the director to be safe, effective, and therapeutically
equivalent or interchangeable. The director shall not approve as
substitutable, and the Hawaii list of equivalent generic drug products and
interchangeable biological products shall not include, any biological products
that the United States Food and Drug Administration has neither licensed and
determined as meeting the standards for interchangeability pursuant to title 42
United States Code section 262(k)(4) nor determined as therapeutically
equivalent as set forth in the latest edition of or supplement to the United
States Food and Drug Administration's approved drug products with therapeutic
equivalence evaluations.

(d) The director may remove from the Hawaii
list of equivalent generic drug products and interchangeable biological
products any products upon the director's finding that the safety, quality,
efficacy, or therapeutic equivalency or bioequivalency, as appropriate, is not
adequately assured.

(e) Any person who requests that any
modification be made to, or that a drug product or biological product be added
to or removed from, the Hawaii list of equivalent generic drug products and
interchangeable biological products shall have the burden of proof to show
cause why the modification, addition, or removal should be made.

(f) Each pharmacy in the State shall update
and maintain its physical copies and electronic records of the Hawaii list of
equivalent generic drug products and interchangeable biological products as it
is approved and periodically updated and amended by the director.

(g) The department shall provide for public education
regarding the provisions of this part and shall monitor the effects of this
part. [L 1980, c 187, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 122, §1(6), (7); am
L 1986, c 174, §1; am L 1996, c 209, §6; am L 1997, c 214, §7; am L 1999, c
209, §2; am L 2003, c 56, §8; am L 2004, c 28, §3; am L 2016, c 242, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next